Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.40.010

Designation.

The only state college in Washington shall be in Thurston county, The Evergreen State College.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 64; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.40.010. Prior: 1967 c 47 s 6; 1961 c 62 s 2; 1957 c 147 s 2; prior: (i) 1909 c 97 p 251 s 1, part; 1897 c 118 s 212; 1893 c 107 s 1; RRS s 4604, part. (ii) 1937 c 23 s 1; RRS s 4604-1. (iii) 1937 c 23 s 2; RRS s 4604-2. (iv) 1937 c 23 s 3; RRS s 4604-3. Formerly RCW 28.81.010.]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.